Wisconsin, session 2025, AB446.
do enact as follows:AB446,11Section 1. 20.932 of the statutes is created to read:AB446,2,3220.932 Discrimination based on antisemitism. (1) Definitions. In this 3section:AB446,2,74(a) “Local governmental unit” means a political subdivision, a special purpose 5district, an agency or corporation of a political subdivision or special purpose 6district, a school district, or a combination or subunit of any of the foregoing, in this 7state.AB446,2,88(b) “Political subdivision” means a city, village, town, or county.AB446,2,119(c) “State agency” means an association, authority, board, department, 10commission, independent agency, institution, office, society, or other body in state 11government created or authorized to be created by the constitution or any law.AB446,2,2212(2) Consideration of definition of antisemitism. Each state agency and 13local governmental unit and each employee or official of this state or of a local 14governmental unit shall consider the definition of antisemitism adopted by the 15International Holocaust Remembrance Alliance on May 26, 2016, including its 16examples, when evaluating evidence of discriminatory intent for any law, 17ordinance, or policy in this state that prohibits discrimination based on race, 18religion, color, or national origin or that provides for enhanced criminal penalties 19for criminal offenses when the defendant intentionally selects the victim or group of 20victims or selects the property that is damaged or otherwise affected by the crime 21because of the victim's or group of victims' actual or perceived race, religion, color, 22or national origin.AB446,3,31(2) Nothing in this section may be construed to diminish or infringe upon any 2right protected under the first amendment to the U.S. Constitution or to conflict 3with federal or state antidiscrimination laws.AB446,3,44